Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-167
Discrimination; legislative intent; state agencies; duties.

It is the intent of the Legislature that no person should be discriminated against on the basis of having taken a human immunodeficiency virus antibody or antigen test.

Each agency of state government shall examine policies and practices within its jurisdiction that may intentionally or unintentionally result in discrimination against a person who has taken a human immunodeficiency virus antibody or antigen test or who has been diagnosed as having acquired immunodeficiency syndrome or acquired immunodeficiency syndrome related complex to ascertain the extent and types of discrimination that may exist. Each agency shall identify proposed changes in statutes or agency rules and regulations to remedy discrimination. Each agency shall report its findings to the Legislature on or before December 1, 1988.

Laws 1988, LB 1012, § 13.